Utah statutes.
9-9-212.   Jurisdiction of tribe over hunting, trapping, or fishing offenses by member.

This chapter does not extend to offenses committed by an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe who is subject to the law of the tribe having jurisdiction of the Indian reservation, or in any case where the exclusive jurisdiction over the offense is, or may be, secured to the Indian tribes respectively.

